New York, session 2025-2026, S5418.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 1-b to read as follows: 3 1-b. Citizenship requirements of police and/or firefighters. Notwith- 4 standing any general, special or local law or administrative code to the 5 contrary, the local governing bodies of the several cities, counties, 6 towns, villages, police and fire districts of the state are hereby 7 authorized to waive any citizenship requirements from the qualifications 8 of police officers and/or firefighters upon the submission by the police 9 officer or firefighter candidate of proof of having received an honor- 10 able or general discharge from the United States army, navy, air force, 11 marines, coast guard, and/or reserves thereof, and/or the army national 12 guard, air national guard, New York guard and/or New York naval militia. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09506-01-5